Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB137.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1716-D(a) introductory paragraph of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1716-D. Limitations.(a) Cap.--Except for tax credits reissued under section 1716.1-D, in no case shall the aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in any fiscal year under this subarticle exceed [$100,000,000] $125,000,000. The department may, in its discretion, award in one fiscal year up to:12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *Section 2. The amendment of section 1716-D(a) introductory paragraph of the act shall apply to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0137PN0083 - 2 - 12345